Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1019
Attachment; receiver; powers and duties; actions by.

Such receiver shall take possession of all notes, due bills, books of account, accounts and all other evidences of debt, that have been taken by the sheriff or other officer as the property of the defendant in attachment, and shall proceed to settle and collect the same. For that purpose, he may commence and maintain actions in his own name as such receiver but in such actions no right of defense shall be impaired or affected.

R.S.1867, Code § 214, p. 428;

R.S.1913, § 7748;

C.S.1922, § 8692;

C.S.1929, § 20-1019;

R.S.1943, § 25-1019.

Accounts due defendant are subject to attachment. Sloan v. Thomas Mfg. Co., 58 Neb. 713, 79 N.W. 728 (1899).